Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.09
Deputies; one full-time; minimum salary.

The salary of one full-time deputy of the various county offices shall not be less than sixty-five percent of the county officer's salary. No full-time deputy shall, except for vacation and sick leave periods established by the county board, be entitled to such salary during any period of time that such deputy is not actually engaged in the performance of the official duties of a deputy.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 9, p. 326;

Laws 1963, c. 119, § 1, p. 465;

Laws 1969, c. 164, § 7, p. 740.

Salary of full-time deputy sheriff could not be fixed at less than minimum prescribed by law. Grace v. County of Douglas, 178 Neb. 690, 134 N.W.2d 818 (1965).